hunspell/kpv/komi.aff
FLAG long
SFX U0 йны янаясӧдз/G1G2G3 .
SFX U0 йны янаясӧдзныд/G1G2G3 .
SFX U0 йны янаясӧдзным/G1G2G3 .
SFX U0 йны янаясӧдзныс/G1G2G3 .
SFX U0 йны янаясӧдзыд/G1G2G3 .
SFX U0 йны янаясӧдзым/G1G2G3 .
SFX U0 йны янаясӧдзыс/G1G2G3 .
SFX U0 йны янаясӧдныд/G1G2G3 .
SFX U0 йны янаясӧдным/G1G2G3 .
SFX U0 йны янаясӧдныс/G1G2G3 .
SFX U0 йны янаясӧдыд/G1G2G3 .
SFX U0 йны янаясӧдым/G1G2G3 .
SFX U0 йны янаясӧдыс/G1G2G3 .
SFX U0 йны янаясӧй/G1G2G3 .
SFX U0 йны янаясӧйкӧд/G1G2G3 .
SFX U0 йны янаясӧйла/G1G2G3 .
SFX U0 йны янаясӧйлань/G1G2G3 .
SFX U0 йны янаясӧйланьсянь/G1G2G3 .
SFX U0 йны янаясӧйлӧн/G1G2G3 .
SFX U0 йны янаясӧйлы/G1G2G3 .
SFX U0 йны янаясӧйлысь/G1G2G3 .
SFX U0 йны янаясӧйся/G1G2G3 .
SFX U0 йны янаясӧйсянь/G1G2G3 .
SFX U0 йны янаясӧйтӧг/G1G2G3 .
SFX U0 йны янаясӧн/G1G2G3 .
SFX U0 йны янаясӧс/G1G2G3 .
SFX U0 йны янаяссьыд/G1G2G3 .
SFX U0 йны янаяссьым/G1G2G3 .
SFX U0 йны янаяссьыныд/G1G2G3 .
SFX U0 йны янаяссьыным/G1G2G3 .
SFX U0 йны янаяссьыныс/G1G2G3 .
SFX U0 йны янаяссьыс/G1G2G3 .
SFX U0 йны янаясся/G1G2G3 .
SFX U0 йны янаяссяныд/G1G2G3 .
SFX U0 йны янаяссяным/G1G2G3 .
SFX U0 йны янаяссяныс/G1G2G3 .
SFX U0 йны янаяссянь/G1G2G3 .
SFX U0 йны янаяссяньныд/G1G2G3 .
SFX U0 йны янаяссяньным/G1G2G3 .
SFX U0 йны янаяссяньныс/G1G2G3 .
SFX U0 йны янаяссяньыд/G1G2G3 .
SFX U0 йны янаяссяньым/G1G2G3 .
SFX U0 йны янаяссяньыс/G1G2G3 .
SFX U0 йны янаяссяыд/G1G2G3 .
SFX U0 йны янаяссяыс/G1G2G3 .
SFX U0 йны янаясті/G1G2G3 .
SFX U0 йны янаястіныд/G1G2G3 .
SFX U0 йны янаястіным/G1G2G3 .
SFX U0 йны янаястіныс/G1G2G3 .
SFX U0 йны янаястіыд/G1G2G3 .
SFX U0 йны янаястіым/G1G2G3 .
SFX U0 йны янаястіыс/G1G2G3 .
SFX U0 йны янаястӧг/G1G2G3 .
SFX U0 йны янаястӧгныд/G1G2G3 .
SFX U0 йны янаястӧгным/G1G2G3 .
SFX U0 йны янаястӧгныс/G1G2G3 .
SFX U0 йны янаястӧгыд/G1G2G3 .
SFX U0 йны янаястӧгыс/G1G2G3 .
SFX U0 йны янаясыд/G1G2G3 .
SFX U0 йны янаясыдкӧд/G1G2G3 .
SFX U0 йны янаясыдла/G1G2G3 .
SFX U0 йны янаясыдлӧн/G1G2G3 .
SFX U0 йны янаясыдлы/G1G2G3 .
SFX U0 йны янаясыдлысь/G1G2G3 .
SFX U0 йны янаясын/G1G2G3 .
SFX U0 йны янаясыс/G1G2G3 .
SFX U0 йны янаясыскӧд/G1G2G3 .
SFX U0 йны янаясысла/G1G2G3 .
SFX U0 йны янаясыслӧн/G1G2G3 .
SFX U0 йны янаясыслы/G1G2G3 .
SFX U0 йны янаясыслысь/G1G2G3 .
SFX U0 йны янаясысь/G1G2G3 .
SFX U0 йны янін/G1G2G3 .
SFX U0 йны янінад/G1G2G3 .
SFX U0 йны янінам/G1G2G3 .
SFX U0 йны янінаным/G1G2G3 .
SFX U0 йны янінаныд/G1G2G3 .
SFX U0 йны янінаныс/G1G2G3 .
SFX U0 йны янінас/G1G2G3 .
SFX U0 йны янінкӧд/G1G2G3 .
SFX U0 йны янінла/G1G2G3 .
SFX U0 йны янінладор/G1G2G3 .
SFX U0 йны янінладорас/G1G2G3 .
SFX U0 йны янінладорӧ/G1G2G3 .
SFX U0 йны янінладорсянь/G1G2G3 .
SFX U0 йны янінладорсяньыс/G1G2G3 .
SFX U0 йны янінладорын/G1G2G3 .
SFX U0 йны янінладорыс/G1G2G3 .
SFX U0 йны янінлань/G1G2G3 .
SFX U0 йны янінланьным/G1G2G3 .
SFX U0 йны янінланьныс/G1G2G3 .
SFX U0 йны янінланьӧ/G1G2G3 .
SFX U0 йны янінланьӧд/G1G2G3 .
SFX U0 йны янінланьӧдз/G1G2G3 .
SFX U0 йны янінланьӧдзныд/G1G2G3 .
SFX U0 йны янінланьӧдзным/G1G2G3 .
SFX U0 йны янінланьӧдзныс/G1G2G3 .
SFX U0 йны янінланьӧдзыд/G1G2G3 .
SFX U0 йны янінланьӧдзым/G1G2G3 .
SFX U0 йны янінланьӧдзыс/G1G2G3 .
SFX U0 йны янінланьӧдныд/G1G2G3 .
SFX U0 йны янінланьӧдным/G1G2G3 .
SFX U0 йны янінланьӧдныс/G1G2G3 .
SFX U0 йны янінланьӧдыд/G1G2G3 .
SFX U0 йны янінланьӧдым/G1G2G3 .
SFX U0 йны янінланьӧдыс/G1G2G3 .
SFX U0 йны янінланьсьыд/G1G2G3 .
SFX U0 йны янінланьсьым/G1G2G3 .
SFX U0 йны янінланьсьыныд/G1G2G3 .
SFX U0 йны янінланьсьыным/G1G2G3 .
SFX U0 йны янінланьсьыныс/G1G2G3 .
SFX U0 йны янінланьсьыс/G1G2G3 .
SFX U0 йны янінланьсянь/G1G2G3 .
SFX U0 йны янінланьсяньныд/G1G2G3 .
SFX U0 йны янінланьсяньным/G1G2G3 .
SFX U0 йны янінланьсяньныс/G1G2G3 .
SFX U0 йны янінланьсяньыд/G1G2G3 .
SFX U0 йны янінланьсяньыс/G1G2G3 .
SFX U0 йны янінланьтіныд/G1G2G3 .
SFX U0 йны янінланьтіным/G1G2G3 .
SFX U0 йны янінланьтіныс/G1G2G3 .
SFX U0 йны янінланьтіыд/G1G2G3 .
SFX U0 йны янінланьтіым/G1G2G3 .
SFX U0 йны янінланьтіыс/G1G2G3 .
SFX U0 йны янінланьыд/G1G2G3 .
SFX U0 йны янінланьым/G1G2G3 .
SFX U0 йны янінланьын/G1G2G3 .
SFX U0 йны янінланьыс/G1G2G3 .
SFX U0 йны янінланьысь/G1G2G3 .
SFX U0 йны янінланяд/G1G2G3 .
SFX U0 йны янінланям/G1G2G3 .
SFX U0 йны янінланяныд/G1G2G3 .
SFX U0 йны янінланяным/G1G2G3 .
SFX U0 йны янінланяныс/G1G2G3 .
SFX U0 йны янінланяс/G1G2G3 .
SFX U0 йны янінлаыд/G1G2G3 .
SFX U0 йны янінлаыс/G1G2G3 .
SFX U0 йны янінлӧн/G1G2G3 .
SFX U0 йны янінлӧнӧсь/G1G2G3 .
SFX U0 йны янінлы/G1G2G3 .
SFX U0 йны янінлысь/G1G2G3 .
SFX U0 йны яніннад/G1G2G3 .
SFX U0 йны яніннам/G1G2G3 .
SFX U0 йны яніннаныд/G1G2G3 .
SFX U0 йны яніннаным/G1G2G3 .
SFX U0 йны яніннаныс/G1G2G3 .
SFX U0 йны яніннас/G1G2G3 .
SFX U0 йны янінныд/G1G2G3 .
SFX U0 йны янінныдкӧд/G1G2G3 .
SFX U0 йны янінныдла/G1G2G3 .
SFX U0 йны янінныдлань/G1G2G3 .
SFX U0 йны янінныдлӧн/G1G2G3 .
SFX U0 йны янінныдлы/G1G2G3 .
SFX U0 йны янінныдлысь/G1G2G3 .
SFX U0 йны янінным/G1G2G3 .
SFX U0 йны яніннымкӧд/G1G2G3 .
SFX U0 йны яніннымла/G1G2G3 .
SFX U0 йны яніннымлань/G1G2G3 .
SFX U0 йны яніннымлӧн/G1G2G3 .
SFX U0 йны яніннымлы/G1G2G3 .
SFX U0 йны яніннымлысь/G1G2G3 .
SFX U0 йны яніннымӧс/G1G2G3 .
SFX U0 йны янінныс/G1G2G3 .
SFX U0 йны янінныскӧд/G1G2G3 .
SFX U0 йны яніннысла/G1G2G3 .
SFX U0 йны янінныслань/G1G2G3 .
SFX U0 йны янінныслӧн/G1G2G3 .
SFX U0 йны янінныслы/G1G2G3 .
SFX U0 йны янінныслысь/G1G2G3 .
SFX U0 йны янінӧ/G1G2G3 .
SFX U0 йны янінӧд/G1G2G3 .
SFX U0 йны янінӧдз/G1G2G3 .
SFX U0 йны янінӧдзныд/G1G2G3 .
SFX U0 йны янінӧдзным/G1G2G3 .
SFX U0 йны янінӧдзныс/G1G2G3 .
SFX U0 йны янінӧдзыд/G1G2G3 .
SFX U0 йны янінӧдзым/G1G2G3 .
SFX U0 йны янінӧдзыс/G1G2G3 .
SFX U0 йны янінӧдныд/G1G2G3 .
SFX U0 йны янінӧдным/G1G2G3 .
SFX U0 йны янінӧдныс/G1G2G3 .
SFX U0 йны янінӧдыд/G1G2G3 .
SFX U0 йны янінӧдым/G1G2G3 .
SFX U0 йны янінӧдыс/G1G2G3 .
SFX U0 йны янінӧй/G1G2G3 .
SFX U0 йны янінӧйкӧд/G1G2G3 .
SFX U0 йны янінӧйла/G1G2G3 .
SFX U0 йны янінӧйлань/G1G2G3 .
SFX U0 йны янінӧйланьсянь/G1G2G3 .
SFX U0 йны янінӧйлӧн/G1G2G3 .
SFX U0 йны янінӧйлы/G1G2G3 .
SFX U0 йны янінӧйлысь/G1G2G3 .
SFX U0 йны янінӧйся/G1G2G3 .
SFX U0 йны янінӧйсянь/G1G2G3 .
SFX U0 йны янінӧйтӧг/G1G2G3 .
SFX U0 йны янінӧн/G1G2G3 .
SFX U0 йны янінӧс/G1G2G3 .
SFX U0 йны янінсьыд/G1G2G3 .
SFX U0 йны янінсьым/G1G2G3 .
SFX U0 йны янінсьыныд/G1G2G3 .
SFX U0 йны янінсьыным/G1G2G3 .
SFX U0 йны янінсьыныс/G1G2G3 .
SFX U0 йны янінсьыс/G1G2G3 .
SFX U0 йны янінся/G1G2G3 .
SFX U0 йны янінсяныд/G1G2G3 .
SFX U0 йны янінсяным/G1G2G3 .
SFX U0 йны янінсяныс/G1G2G3 .
SFX U0 йны янінсянь/G1G2G3 .
SFX U0 йны янінсяньныд/G1G2G3 .
SFX U0 йны янінсяньным/G1G2G3 .
SFX U0 йны янінсяньныс/G1G2G3 .
SFX U0 йны янінсяньыд/G1G2G3 .
SFX U0 йны янінсяньым/G1G2G3 .
SFX U0 йны янінсяньыс/G1G2G3 .
SFX U0 йны янінсяыд/G1G2G3 .
SFX U0 йны янінсяыс/G1G2G3 .
SFX U0 йны янінті/G1G2G3 .
SFX U0 йны янінтіныд/G1G2G3 .
SFX U0 йны янінтіным/G1G2G3 .
SFX U0 йны янінтіныс/G1G2G3 .
SFX U0 йны янінтіыд/G1G2G3 .
SFX U0 йны янінтіым/G1G2G3 .
SFX U0 йны янінтіыс/G1G2G3 .
SFX U0 йны янінтӧг/G1G2G3 .
SFX U0 йны янінтӧгныд/G1G2G3 .
SFX U0 йны янінтӧгным/G1G2G3 .
SFX U0 йны янінтӧгныс/G1G2G3 .
SFX U0 йны янінтӧгыд/G1G2G3 .
SFX U0 йны янінтӧгыс/G1G2G3 .
SFX U0 йны янінъяд/G1G2G3 .
SFX U0 йны янінъядӧсь/G1G2G3 .
SFX U0 йны янінъям/G1G2G3 .
SFX U0 йны янінъямӧсь/G1G2G3 .
SFX U0 йны янінъянӧй/G1G2G3 .
SFX U0 йны янінъяныд/G1G2G3 .
SFX U0 йны янінъяныдӧсь/G1G2G3 .
SFX U0 йны янінъяным/G1G2G3 .
SFX U0 йны янінъянымӧсь/G1G2G3 .
SFX U0 йны янінъяныс/G1G2G3 .
SFX U0 йны янінъянысӧсь/G1G2G3 .
SFX U0 йны янінъяс/G1G2G3 .
SFX U0 йны янінъяса/G1G2G3 .
SFX U0 йны янінъясад/G1G2G3 .
SFX U0 йны янінъясам/G1G2G3 .
SFX U0 йны янінъясанӧй/G1G2G3 .
SFX U0 йны янінъясаныд/G1G2G3 .
SFX U0 йны янінъясаным/G1G2G3 .
SFX U0 йны янінъясаныс/G1G2G3 .
SFX U0 йны янінъясаӧсь/G1G2G3 .
SFX U0 йны янінъясас/G1G2G3 .
SFX U0 йны янінъясбердса/G1G2G3 .
SFX U0 йны янінъясбердсаӧсь/G1G2G3 .
SFX U0 йны янінъясбӧрса/G1G2G3 .
SFX U0 йны янінъясбӧрсаӧсь/G1G2G3 .
SFX U0 йны янінъясвесьтса/G1G2G3 .
SFX U0 йны янінъясвесьтсаӧсь/G1G2G3 .
SFX U0 йны янінъясводзса/G1G2G3 .
SFX U0 йны янінъясводзсаӧсь/G1G2G3 .
