hunspell/kpv/komi.dic
атшвайны/U6U0V3V5V6
вайны/U6U0V3V5V6
вийны/U6U0V3V5V6
войны/U6U0V3V5V6
вӧйны/U6U0V3V5V6
сайны/U6U0V3V5V6
дільквайны/U6U0V3V5V6
кайны/U6U0V3V5V6
койны/U6U0V3V5V6
кыйны/U6U0V3V5V6
лойны/U6U0V3V5V6
лыйны/U6U0V3V5V6
парквайны/U6U0V3V5V6
сёйны/U6U0V3V5V6
сюйны/U6U0V3V5V6
тойны/U6U0V3V5V6
туйны/U6U0V3V5V6
уйны/U6U0V3V5V6
выйны/U6U0V3V5V6
ройны/U6U0V3V5V6
